California statutes. Civil Code
prior to the sale, by the lessor to the state in order to avoid penalties that would have accrued because of late payment of such fees, the lessor shall return such excess amount to the lessee, whether or not such lessee requests the return of the excess amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2986.6.

No agreement in connection with a lease contract which provides for the inclusion of title to or a lien upon any personal or real property, other than the motor vehicle which is the subject matter of the lease contract, or accessories therefor, or special and auxiliary equipment used in connection therewith, as security for the payment of the contract obligations, shall be enforceable. This section does not apply to a security deposit, advance payment of rent or other cash prepayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2986.10.

(a) An assignee of the lessor’s rights is subject to all equities and defenses of the lessee against the lessor, notwithstanding an agreement to the contrary, but the assignee’s liability may not exceed the amount of the obligation owing to the assignee at the time of the assignment.

(b) The assignee shall have recourse against the lessor to the extent of any liability incurred by the assignee pursuant to this section regardless of whether the assignment was with or without recourse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2986.12.

It shall be unlawful for any lessor to induce or attempt to induce any person to enter into a contract subject to this chapter by offering a rebate, discount, commission or other consideration, on the condition that the lessee gives information or assistance for the purpose of enabling a lessor to either lease or sell a motor vehicle to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2986.13.

(a) Any payment made by a lessee to a lessor pending the execution of a lease contract shall be refunded to the lessee in the event the lease contract is not executed.

(b) In the event of breach by the lessor of a lease contract where the lessee leaves his or her motor vehicle with the lessor as a trade-in downpayment and the motor vehicle is not returned by the lessor to the lessee for whatever reason, the lessee may recover from the lessor either the fair market value
of the motor vehicle left as a downpayment or its value as stated in the lease contract, whichever is greater. The recovery shall be tendered to the lessee within five business days after the breach.

(c) The remedies of the buyer provided for in subdivision (b) are nonexclusive and cumulative and shall not preclude the lessee from pursuing any other remedy which he or she may have under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 800, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2987.

(a) A lessee has the right to terminate a lease contract at any time prior to the scheduled expiration date specified in the lease contract. Except as provided in subdivision (f), all of the following subdivisions of this section apply in the event of an early termination.

(b) The lessee’s liability shall not exceed the sum of the following:

(1) All unpaid periodic lease payments that have accrued up to the date
of termination.

(2) All other amounts due and unpaid by the lessee under the lease contract, other than excess wear and mileage charges and unpaid periodic lease payments.

(3) Any charges, however denominated, that the lessor or holder of the lease contract may assess in connection with termination not to exceed in the aggregate the amount of a reasonable disposition fee, if any, disclosed in the lease contract and assessed upon termination of the lease contract.

(4) In the event of the lessee’s default, reasonable fees paid by the lessor or holder for reconditioning of the leased vehicle and reasonable and necessary fees paid by the lessor or holder, if any, in connection with the repossession and storage of the leased vehicle.

(5) The difference, if
any, between the adjusted capitalized cost disclosed in the lease contract and the sum of (A) all depreciation and other amortized amounts accrued through the date of early termination, calculated in accordance with the constant yield or other generally accepted actuarial method, and (B) the realized value of the vehicle as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) Subject to subdivision (d), the realized value of the vehicle used to calculate the lessee’s liability under paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) shall be (1) if the lessee maintains insurance on the leased vehicle as required in the lease contract and the vehicle is a total loss as a result of theft or damage, the amount of any applicable insurance deductible owed by the lessee and the proceeds of the settlement of the insurance claim, unless a higher amount is agreed to by the holder of the lease contract, (2) if the lessee elects to have an appraisal conducted as provided in Regulation M, the
value determined on appraisal, (3) if the holder of the lease contract or lessor elects to retain ownership of the vehicle for use or to lease to a subsequent lessee, the wholesale value of the vehicle as specified in the current edition of a recognized used vehicle value guide customarily used by California motor vehicle dealers to value vehicles in this state, including, but not limited to, the Kelley Blue Book Auto Market Report and the N.A.D.A. Official Used Car Guide, or (4) under all other circumstances, the higher of (A) the price paid for the vehicle upon disposition, or (B) any other amount established by the lessor or the lease contract.

(d) (1) The lessor or holder of the lease contract shall act in good faith and in a commercially reasonable manner in connection with the disposition of the vehicle.

(2) In addition to the requirements of paragraph
(1), any disposition of the vehicle shall be preceded by a notice complying with both of the following:

(A) The notice shall be in writing and given by the holder of the contract to each lessee and guarantor at least 10 days in advance of any disposition or the date by which the value of the vehicle will be determined pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c). The notice shall be personally served or shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or first-class mail, postage prepaid, directed to the last known address of each lessee and guarantor. One notice is sufficient if those persons are married to each other and the most recent records of the holder of the lease contract indicate that they reside at the same address. The last known address of each lessee and guarantor shall be presumed to be the address stated in the lease contract or guaranty for each lessee and guarantor unless the lessee or guarantor notifies the holder
of the lease contract of a change of address.

(B) The notice shall set forth (i) the time and place of any public sale, the time on or after which a private sale or other intended disposition is to be made, or the date by which the value of the vehicle will be determined pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), (ii) an itemization of all amounts claimed under paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b), (iii) the amount of the difference between the adjusted capitalized cost and the sum of all depreciation and other amortized amounts paid through the date of early termination as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), (iv) the total of these amounts identified as the “Gross Early Termination Amount,” and (v) one of the following statements, whichever is applicable:

[To be inserted when the realized value will be determined pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c)]

“The amount you owe for early termination will be no more than the difference between the Gross Early Termination Amount stated above and (1) the appraised value of the vehicle or (2) if there is no appraisal, the wholesale value specified in a recognized used vehicle value guide.

You have the right to get a professional appraisal to establish the value of the vehicle for the purpose of figuring how much you owe on the lease. If you want an appraisal, you will have to arrange for it to be completed at least three days before the scheduled valuation date. The appraiser has to be an independent person acceptable to the holder of the lease. You will have to pay for the appraiser. The appraised value will be considered final and binding on you and the holder of the lease.”

[To be inserted in all other circumstances]

“The amount you owe for early
termination will be no more than the difference between the Gross Early Termination Amount stated above and (1) the appraised value of the vehicle or (2) if there is no appraisal, either the price received for the vehicle upon disposition or a greater amount established by the lessor or the lease contract.

You have the right to get a professional appraisal to establish the value of the vehicle for the purpose of figuring how much you owe on the lease. If you want an appraisal, you will have to arrange for it to be completed at least three days before the scheduled sale date of the vehicle. The appraiser has to be an independent person acceptable to the holder of the lease. You will have to pay for the appraiser. The appraised value will be considered final and binding on you and the holder of the lease.”

(3) The lessee shall have no liability under subdivision (b) if the lessor or holder of the lease
contract does not comply with this subdivision. This paragraph does not apply under all the following conditions:

(A) Noncompliance was the result of a bona fide error in stating an amount required to be disclosed pursuant to clause (ii), (iii), or (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(B) The holder of the lease gives the lessee written notice of the error within 30 days after discovering the error and before (i) an action is filed to recover the amount claimed to be owed or (ii) written notice of the error is received by the holder of the lease from the lessee.

(C) The lessee is liable for the lesser of the originally claimed amount or the correct amount.

(D) The holder of the lease refunds any amount collected in excess of the amount described
in subparagraph (C) within 10 days after notice of the error is given. “Bona fide error,” as used in this paragraph, means an error that was not intentional and occurred notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid that error. Examples of a bona fide error include clerical errors, calculation errors, errors due to unintentionally improper computer programming or data entry, and printing errors, but does not include an error of legal judgment with respect to a lessor’s or lease contractholder’s obligations under this section.

(4) This subdivision does not apply when the lessee maintains insurance on the leased vehicle as required in the lease contract and the vehicle is declared a total loss by the insurer as a result of theft or damage.

(e) The lessor or holder of the lease contract shall credit any security deposit or advance rental payment held by
the lessor or holder of the lease contract against the lessee’s liability under the lease contract as limited by this section. The portion of a security deposit or advance rental payment, if any, remaining after the lessee’s liability under the lease contract as limited by this section has been satisfied shall be returned to the lessee within 30 days of the satisfaction of the obligation.

(f) Subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, do not apply if, prior to the scheduled expiration date specified in the lease contract, the lessee terminates the lease and purchases the vehicle or trades in the vehicle in connection with the purchase or lease of another vehicle. In such an event, the selling price of the leased vehicle, exclusive of taxes and other charges incidental to the sale, shall not exceed the sum of the following and shall relieve the lessee of any further liability under the lease contract:

(1) All unpaid periodic lease payments that have accrued up to the date of termination.

(2) All other amounts due and unpaid by the lessee under the lease contract, other than excess wear and mileage charges and unpaid periodic lease payments.

(3) Any charges, however denominated, that the lessor or holder of the lease contract may assess in connection with termination of the lease contract and the acquisition of the vehicle, not to exceed in the aggregate the amount of a reasonable purchase option fee, if any, disclosed in the lease contract and assessed upon the scheduled termination of the lease contract.

(4) The adjusted capitalized cost disclosed in the lease contract less all depreciation and other amortized amounts accrued through the date of early termination, calculated in accordance with the
constant yield or other generally accepted actuarial method.

(g) If the lessee terminates a lease contract, voluntarily returns possession of the vehicle to the lessor, and timely pays all sums required under the lease contract as limited by this section, the lessor or holder shall not provide any adverse information concerning the early termination to any consumer credit reporting agency.

(h) The Rule of 78 shall not be used to calculate accrued rent charges.

(i) This section shall only apply to lease contracts entered into on and after January 1, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 800, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2988.

(a) The Legislature finds that it is necessary to provide some protection for consumers who enter into lease contracts in which the lessee will bear the risk of the motor vehicle’s depreciation. This section is intended to provide relief to the consumer when an ostensibly inexpensive lease contract establishes an excessively low level of periodic payment which results, conversely, in an excessively high liability being imposed on the lessee at the expiration of the lease term because the lessor has failed to act in good faith in either estimating a residual value of the motor vehicle or establishing a level of periodic payment which bears no
reasonable relation to the motor vehicle’s reasonably expected depreciation during the lease term. Therefore, the lessor will have the obligation to act in good faith and to come forward with competent evidence showing that the estimated residual value was so determined given the circumstances existing at the inception of the lease contract.

(b) Where the lessee is to bear the risk of the motor vehicle’s depreciation and the lessee’s liability on expiration of a consumer lease is based on the estimated residual value of the motor vehicle such estimated residual value shall be a reasonable approximation of the anticipated actual fair market value of the motor vehicle on lease expiration. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the estimated residual value is unreasonable to the extent that the estimated residual value exceeds the actual residual value by more than three times the average payment allocable to a monthly period under the
lease. The presumption stated in the preceding sentence shall not apply to the extent the excess of estimated over actual residual value is due to physical damage to the motor vehicle beyond reasonable wear and use, or to excessive use, and the lease may set standards for such wear and use if such standards are not unreasonable.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “fair market value” means the value the motor vehicle would have when sold in a commercially reasonable manner in the customary market for such motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2988.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, any lessor who fails to comply with any requirement imposed under Section 2985.8 or 2988 for which no specific relief is provided with respect to any person shall be liable to such person in an amount equal to the sum of:

(1) Any actual damages sustained by such person as a result of the failure.

(2) In the case of an individual action, 25 percent of the total amount of monthly payments under the lease except that liability under this subparagraph shall not be less than
one hundred dollars ($100) nor greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000); or in the case of a class action, such amount as the court may allow, except that as to each member of the class no minimum recovery shall be applicable, and the total recovery in such action shall not be more than the lesser of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or 1 percent of the net worth of the lessor.

(3) The costs of the action, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee as determined by the court.

(b) In determining the amount of award in any class action, the court shall consider, among other relevant factors, the amount of any actual damages sustained, the frequency and persistence of failure of compliance by the lessor, the resources of the lessor, the number of persons adversely affected, and the extent to which the lessor’s failure of compliance was intentional.

(c) A lessor shall not be liable under this section if within 15 days after discovery of an error, and prior to the institution of an action under this section or the receipt of written notice of the error, the lessor notifies the person concerned of the error and makes whatever adjustments in the appropriate account are necessary to insure that the person will not be required to pay any amount in excess of the amount that should correctly have been disclosed.

(d) A lessor may not be held liable in any action brought under this section for a violation of this chapter if the lessor shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any such error.

(e) Except as otherwise specifically
provided in this chapter, any civil action for a violation of this chapter which may be brought against the original lessor in any lease transaction may be maintained against any subsequent assignee of the original lessor where the violation from which the alleged liability arose is apparent on the face of the instrument assigned unless the assignment is involuntary.

(f) A person may not take any action to offset any amount for which a lessor is potentially liable to such person under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) against any amount owing to such lessor by such person, unless the amount of the lessor’s liability to such person has been determined by judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction in an action to which such person was a party.

(g) No provision of this section imposing any liability shall apply to any act done or omitted in good faith conformity with any rule,
regulation or interpretation of federal law, notwithstanding that after such act or omission has occurred, such rule, regulation or interpretation is amended, rescinded or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(h) The multiple failure to disclose any information required under this chapter to be disclosed in connection with a single lease transaction shall entitle the person to a single recovery under this section, but continued failure to disclose after a recovery has been granted shall give rise to rights to additional recoveries.

(i) Actions alleging a failure to disclose or otherwise comply with the requirements of this chapter shall be brought within one year of the termination of the lease contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2988.7.

If the lessor fails to comply with Section 2985.8, as an alternative to an action under Section 2988.5, the lessee may rescind the contract if the failure to comply was willful, or if correction will increase the amount of the contract balance, unless the lessor waives the collection of the increased amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2988.9.

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs shall be awarded to the prevailing party in any action on a lease contract subject to the provisions of this chapter regardless of whether the action is instituted by the lessor, assignee, or lessee. Where the defendant alleges in his or her answer that he or she tendered to the plaintiff the full amount to which he or she was entitled, and thereupon deposits in court, for the plaintiff, the amount so tendered, and the allegation is found to be true, then the defendant is deemed to be the prevailing party within the
meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2989.

No civil action shall be filed against a lessor under the authority of this chapter if a federal civil action has previously been filed based on facts that give rise to a similar cause of action under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2989.2.

Where the lessee is to bear the risk of the motor vehicle’s depreciation upon the scheduled expiration of the lease contract, the following applies:

(a) When disposing of a vehicle or obtaining cash bids for the purpose of setting the fair market value of a vehicle, the lessor shall act in a commercially reasonable manner in the customary market for such vehicle.

(b) Any provision in a lease contract to the contrary
notwithstanding, at least 10 days written notice of intent to sell such motor vehicle shall be given by the holder of the contract to each lessee and guarantor, unless the lessor and lessee have agreed in writing to the amount of the lessee’s liability under the lease contract after the lessee returns the motor vehicle to the lessor, or the lessee has satisfied the lease contract obligations by payment to the lessor. The notice shall be personally served or shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, directed to the address of the lessee shown on the contract, unless the lessee has notified the holder in writing of a different address. The notice shall set forth separately any charges or sums due and state that the lessee will be liable for the difference between the amount of liability imposed on the lessee at the expiration of the lease term and the actual cash value of the motor vehicle when it is sold. The notice shall also state that the lessee has the right to submit a cash bid for the
purchase of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 800, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2989.4.

(a) A lessor shall not:

(1) Fail to register the leased vehicle pursuant to the lease contract.

(2) Advertise any specific vehicle in the inventory of the lessor for lease without identifying such vehicle by either its vehicle identification number or license number.

(3) Refuse to lease a vehicle to any creditworthy person at the advertised total price, exclusive of sales tax, vehicle registration fees and finance charges. 

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2988.5, a lessor shall not suffer civil liability for a violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2989.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a lessor shall make available to investigators of the Department of Motor Vehicles, upon presentation of an affidavit that the department has a consumer complaint within its jurisdiction, the records relevant to the transaction complained of. If the affidavit states that the department has reasonable cause to believe there is a pattern of conduct or common scheme in similar transactions, the records relevant to all such similar transactions shall be made available.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), on petition of the department
alleging the receipt of a consumer complaint within its jurisdiction and alleging that the lessor refuses to make available his records as required, the court shall order the lessor to make available such records or show cause why such records should not be produced. The department shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs if it prevails in such action.

(c) (1) In the case of a financial institution, or a subsidiary or affiliated corporation of such institution, the Director of Motor Vehicles shall report in writing an apparent violation, or failure to comply with this chapter, evidenced by a consumer complaint, to the agency or department of the state or federal government responsible for supervising the leasing activities of such institution. 

(2) Within 20 days, such agency or department shall advise the director of the action taken with
respect to such report.

(3) If such agency or department fails to so advise the director, the director may commence an action to compel the agency or department to cause the production of the records relevant to the consumer complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2989.6.

The Director of Motor Vehicles may adopt and enforce rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out or implement the provisions of this chapter.

Rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended or repealed in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11370) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2989.8.

Any person who shall knowingly and willfully violate any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2990.

This chapter shall not apply to any transaction which is regulated by Chapter 2b (commencing with Section 2981) of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2991.

Any prospective assignee that provides a lessor under a lease contract with any preprinted form for use as a lease contract shall, upon the request of a lessor, provide the lessor with a Spanish language translation of the preprinted form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative January 1, 2001, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

2992.

A prospective assignee that provides a lessor under a lease contract with a preprinted form for use as a lease contract shall design the form in such a manner so as to provide on its face sufficient space for the lessor to include all disclosures and itemizations required pursuant to Section 2985.8 and shall also contain on its face a separate blank space no smaller than seven and one-half square inches for the lessor and lessee to memorialize trade-in, turn-in, and other individualized agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 287, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2993.

A holder of a lease contract, or the agent of a holder, who has received a notice pursuant to Section 7507.6 of the Business and Professions Code, shall not make a subsequent assignment to skip trace, locate, or repossess the vehicle without simultaneously, and in the same manner by which the assignment is given, advising the assignee of the assignment of the information contained in the notice. As used in this section, “assignment” has the same meaning set forth in Section 7500.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 192, Sec. 5.   Effective September 7, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2e. Controlled Escrows [2995. - 2995.]

2995.

No real estate developer shall require as a condition precedent to the transfer of real property containing a single family residential dwelling that escrow services effectuating such transfer shall be provided by an escrow entity in which the real estate developer has a financial interest.

A real estate developer who violates the provisions of this section shall be liable to the purchaser of the real property in the amount of three times the amount charged for the escrow services, but in no event less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

For
purposes of this section “financial interest” means ownership or control of 5 percent or more of an escrow entity.

For purposes of this section “real estate developer” means a person or entity having an ownership interest in real property which is improved by such person or entity with single family residential dwellings which are offered for sale to the public.

For purposes of this section “escrow entity” includes a person, firm or corporation.

Any waiver of the prohibition contained in this section shall be against public policy and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Health Care Liens [3040. - 3040.]

3040.

(a) No lien asserted by a licensee of the Department of Managed Care or the Department of Insurance, and no lien of a medical group or an independent practice association, to the extent that it asserts or enforces a lien, for the recovery of money paid or payable to or on behalf of an enrollee or insured for health care services provided under a health care service plan contract or a disability insurance policy, when the right of the licensee, medical group, or independent practice association to assert that lien is granted in a plan
contract subject to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) or a disability insurance policy subject to the Insurance Code, may exceed the sum of the reasonable costs actually paid by the licensee, medical group, or independent practice association to perfect the lien and one of the following:

(1) For health care services not provided on a capitated basis, the amount actually paid by the licensee, medical group, or independent practice association pursuant to that contract or policy to any treating medical provider.

(2) For health care services provided on a capitated basis, the amount equal to 80 percent of the usual and customary charge for the same services by medical providers that provide health care services on a noncapitated basis in the geographic region in which the
services were rendered.

(b) If an enrollee or insured received health care services on a capitated basis and on a noncapitated basis, and the licensee, medical group, or independent practice association that provided the health care services on the capitated basis paid for the health care services the enrollee received on the noncapitated basis, then a lien that is subject to subdivision (a) may not exceed the sum of the reasonable costs actually paid to perfect the lien, and the amounts determined pursuant to both paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) If the enrollee or insured engaged an attorney, then the lien subject to subdivision (a) may not exceed the lesser of the following amounts:

(1) The maximum amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), whichever is applicable.

(2) One-third of the moneys due to the enrollee or insured under any final judgment, compromise, or settlement agreement.

(d) If the enrollee or insured did not engage an attorney, then the lien subject to subdivision (a) may not exceed the lesser of the following amounts:

(1) The maximum amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), whichever is applicable.

(2) One-half of the moneys due to the enrollee or insured under any final judgment, compromise, or settlement agreement.

(e) Where a final judgment includes a special finding by a judge, jury, or arbitrator, that the enrollee or insured was partially at fault, the lien subject to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be reduced by the same
comparative fault percentage by which the enrollee or insured’s recovery was reduced.

(f) A lien subject to subdivision (a) or (b) is subject to pro rata reduction, commensurate with the enrollee’s or insured’s reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, in accordance with the common fund doctrine.

(g) This section is not applicable to any of the following:

(1) A lien made against a workers’ compensation claim.

(2) A lien for Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 14124.70) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) A lien for hospital services pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3045.1).

(h) This section does not create any lien right that does not exist at law, and does not make a lien that arises out of an employee benefit plan or fund enforceable if preempted by federal law.

(i) The provisions of this section may not be admitted into evidence nor given in any instruction in any civil action or proceeding between an enrollee or insured and a third party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Hospital Liens [3045.1. - 3045.6.]

3045.1.

Every person, partnership, association, corporation, public entity, or other institution or body maintaining a hospital licensed under the laws of this state which furnishes emergency and ongoing medical or other services to any person injured by reason of an accident or negligent or other wrongful act not covered by Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) or Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code, shall, if the person has a claim against another for damages on account of his or her injuries, have a lien upon the damages recovered,
or to be recovered, by the person, or by his or her heirs or personal representative in case of his or her death to the extent of the amount of the reasonable and necessary charges of the hospital and any hospital affiliated health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, in which services are provided for the treatment, care, and maintenance of the person in the hospital or health facility affiliated with the hospital resulting from that accident or negligent or other wrongful act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3045.2.

The lien shall apply whether the damages are recovered, or are to be recovered, by judgment, settlement, or compromise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2080.)
-------------------------------------------

3045.3.

A lien shall not be effective, however, unless a written notice containing the name and address of the injured person, the date of the accident, the name and location of the hospital, the amount claimed as reasonable and necessary charges, and the name of each person, firm, or corporation known to the hospital and alleged to be liable to the injured person for the injuries received, is delivered or is mailed by registered mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, to each person, firm, or corporation known to the hospital and alleged to be liable to
the injured person for the injuries sustained prior to the payment of any moneys to the injured person, his attorney, or legal representative as compensation for the injuries.

The hospital shall, also, deliver or mail by registered mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, a copy of the notice to any insurance carrier known to the hospital which has insured the person, firm, or corporation alleged to be liable to the injured person against the liability. The person, firm, or corporation alleged to be liable to the injured person shall, upon request of the hospital, disclose to the hospital the name of the insurance carrier which has insured it against the liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 302, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3045.4.

Any person, firm, or corporation, including, but not limited to, an insurance carrier, making any payment to the injured person, or to his or her attorney, heirs, or legal representative, for the injuries he or she sustained, after the receipt of the notice as provided by Section 3045.3, without paying to the association, corporation, public entity, or other institution or body maintaining the hospital the amount of its lien claimed in the notice, or so much thereof as can be satisfied out of 50 percent of the moneys due under any final judgment, compromise,
or settlement agreement after paying any prior liens shall be liable to the person, partnership, association, corporation, public entity, or other institution or body maintaining the hospital for the amount of its lien claimed in the notice which the hospital was entitled to receive as payment for the medical care and services rendered to the injured person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 302, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3045.5.

The person, partnership, association, corporation or other institution or body maintaining the hospital may, at any time within one year after the date of the payment to the injured person, or to his heirs, attorney, or legal representative, enforce its lien by filing an action at law against the person, firm, or corporation making the payment and to whom such notice was given as herein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2080.)
-------------------------------------------

3045.6.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any claim or cause of action against a common carrier subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission or the Interstate Commerce Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2080.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Other Liens [3046. - 3066.]

3046.

One who sells real property has a vendor’s lien thereon, independent of possession, for so much of the price as remains unpaid and unsecured otherwise than by the personal obligation of the buyer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3047.

Where a buyer of real property gives to the seller a written contract for payment of all or part of the price, an absolute transfer of such contract by the seller waives his lien to the extent of the sum payable under the contract, but a transfer of such contract in trust to pay debts, and return the surplus, is not a waiver of the lien.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3048.

The liens defined in Sections 3046 and 3050 are valid against every one claiming under the debtor, except a purchaser or incumbrancer in good faith and for value.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.

One who pays to the owner any part of the price of real property, under an agreement for the sale thereof, has a special lien upon the property, independent of possession, for such part of the amount paid as he may be entitled to recover back, in case of a failure of consideration.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3051.
